New York, session 2025-2026, A2525.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "small 2 business fairness act". 3 § 2. Section 29-a of the executive law is amended by adding a new 4 subdivision 5 to read as follows: 5 5. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section and any other 6 special, general or local law to the contrary, a person operating a 7 business that has been ordered to cease or limit operations pursuant to 8 an executive order issued under this section due to a declared state 9 disaster emergency may continue or resume operations if: 10 (a) the products sold or services offered by the business are also 11 available at a business that has not been required to cease or limit 12 operations by the executive order and the open business is operating at 13 a physical location in the area affected by the order; and 14 (b) the business that was required to limit or cease operations 15 complies with any safety precautions that the order requires of busi- 16 nesses that are permitted to continue operations. 17 § 3. The public health law is amended by adding a new section 12-e to 18 read as follows: 19 § 12-e. Health emergency order; limitations. 1. Notwithstanding the 20 provisions of any other general, special or local law to the contrary, a 21 person operating a business that has been ordered to cease or limit 22 operations by a state or local public health official due to a declared 23 emergency, an epidemic, a threatened epidemic, or the unusual prevalence 24 of a dangerous communicable disease, may continue or resume operations 25 if: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01448-01-5 A. 2525 2 1 (a) the products sold or services offered by the business are also 2 available at a business that has not been required to cease or limit 3 operations by the order and the open business is operating at a physical 4 location in the area affected by the order; and 5 (b) the business that was required to limit or cease operations 6 complies with any safety precautions that the order requires of busi- 7 nesses that are permitted to continue operations. 8 2. As used in this section the term "order" includes a notice, stand- 9 ard, rule, or regulation issued by the department or a local public 10 health agency. 11 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.